Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 2. Boards of Fisheries and Game.

Sec. 16.05.220.
The Board of Fish and Game. [Repealed, § 40 ch 206 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.221.
Boards of fisheries and game.

For purposes of the conservation and development of the fishery resources of the state, there is created the Board of Fisheries composed of seven members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The governor shall appoint each member on the basis of interest in public affairs, good judgment, knowledge, and ability in the field of action of the board, and with a view to providing diversity of interest and points of view in the membership. The appointed members shall be residents of the state and shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation or geographical location of residence. The commissioner is not a member of the Board of Fisheries, but shall be ex officio secretary.

For purposes of the conservation and development of the game resources of the state, there is created a Board of Game composed of seven members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The governor shall appoint each member on the basis of interest in public affairs, good judgment, knowledge, and ability in the field of action of the board, and with a view to providing diversity of interest and points of view in the membership. The appointed members shall be residents of the state and shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation or geographical location of residence. The commissioner is not a member of the Board of Game, but shall be ex officio secretary.

Members of the Board of Game serve staggered terms of three years. The terms of the members of the board begin on July 1. Notwithstanding AS

39.05.080

(1), by April 1 of the calendar year in which the term expires, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy that will arise on the board because of the expiration of the term of a member of the board and submit the name of the person to the legislature for confirmation. If a vacancy arises on the board, the governor shall, within 30 days after the vacancy arises, appoint a person to serve the balance of the unexpired term and submit the name of the person to the legislature for confirmation. A person appointed to fill the balance of an unexpired term shall serve on the board from the date of appointment until the earlier of the expiration of the term or the failure of the legislature to confirm the person under AS

39.05.080

.

Members of the Board of Fisheries serve staggered terms of three years. The terms of members of the board begin on July 1. Notwithstanding AS

39.05.080

(1), by April 1 of the calendar year in which the term expires, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy that will arise on the board due to expiration of the term of a member of the board and submit the name of the person to the legislature for confirmation. If a vacancy arises on the board, the governor shall, within 30 days after the vacancy arises, appoint a person to serve the balance of the unexpired term and submit the name of the person to the legislature for confirmation. A person appointed to fill the balance of an unexpired term shall serve on the board from the date of appointment until the earlier of the expiration of the term or the failure of the legislature to confirm the person under AS

39.05.080

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 118 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 121 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 8 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 80 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2008)

Opinions of attorney general. —

For purposes of conservation, development, and utilization, the Board of Game has general authority to regulate seasons, areas, bag limits, and quotas for sport and subsistence hunting.
Apr. 12, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Board of Fisheries is empowered to adopt regulations that will provide broodstock to the hatcheries; furthermore, because management for sustained yield is required by Article VIII, Section 4, of the Alaska Constitution, the law directs the board to manage for this result. Aug. 1, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.230.
Term of office. [Repealed, § 40 ch 206 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.240.
Powers excluded. [Repealed, § 40 ch 206 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.241.
Powers excluded.

The boards have regulation-making powers as set out in this chapter, but do not have administrative, budgeting, or fiscal powers.

History.

(§ 3 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.05.250.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 40 ch 206 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 16.05.251.
Regulations of the Board of Fisheries.

The Board of Fisheries may adopt regulations it considers advisable in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for

setting apart fish reserve areas, refuges, and sanctuaries in the waters of the state over which it has jurisdiction, subject to the approval of the legislature;

establishing open and closed seasons and areas for the taking of fish; if consistent with resource conservation and development goals, the board may adopt regulations establishing restricted seasons and areas necessary for

persons 60 years of age and older to participate in sport, personal use, or subsistence fishing; or

residents under 18 years of age and nonresidents under 16 years of age to participate in sport fishing;

setting quotas, bag limits, harvest levels, and sex and size limitations on the taking of fish;

establishing the means and methods employed in the pursuit, capture, and transport of fish;

establishing marking and identification requirements for means used in pursuit, capture, and transport of fish;

classifying as commercial fish, sport fish, guided sport fish, personal use fish, subsistence fish, or predators or other categories essential for regulatory purposes;

watershed and habitat improvement, and management, conservation, protection, use, disposal, propagation, and stocking of fish;

investigating and determining the extent and effect of disease, predation, and competition among fish in the state, exercising control measures considered necessary to the resources of the state;

prohibiting and regulating the live capture, possession, transport, or release of native or exotic fish or their eggs;

establishing seasons, areas, quotas, and methods of harvest for aquatic plants;

establishing the times and dates during which the issuance of fishing licenses, permits, and registrations and the transfer of permits and registrations between registration areas is allowed; however, this paragraph does not apply to permits issued or transferred under AS 16.43;

regulating commercial, sport, guided sport, subsistence, and personal use fishing as needed for the conservation, development, and utilization of fisheries;

requiring, in a fishery, observers on board fishing vessels, as defined in AS

16.05.475(d)

, that are registered under the laws of the state, as defined in AS

16.05.475(c)

, after making a written determination that an onboard observer program

is the only practical data-gathering or enforcement mechanism for that fishery;

will not unduly disrupt the fishery;

can be conducted at a reasonable cost; and

can be coordinated with observer programs of other agencies, including the National Marine Fisheries Service, North Pacific Fishery Management Council, and the International Pacific Halibut Commission;

establishing nonexclusive, exclusive, and superexclusive registration and use areas for regulating commercial fishing;

regulating resident or nonresident sport fishermen as needed for the conservation, development, and utilization of fishery resources;

requiring unlicensed fishing vessels present in or transiting the waters of the state to report to the department the quantity, species, and origin of fish on board; in this paragraph, “unlicensed fishing vessel” means a fishing vessel that is not licensed under AS

16.05.490

—

16.05.530

;

promoting fishing and preserving the heritage of fishing in the state.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 52 SLA 1986.]

If the Board of Fisheries denies a petition or proposal to amend, adopt, or repeal a regulation, the board, upon receiving a written request from the sponsor of the petition or proposal, shall in addition to the requirements of AS

44.62.230

provide a written explanation for the denial to the sponsor not later than 30 days after the board has officially met and denied the sponsor’s petition or proposal, or 30 days after receiving the request for an explanation, whichever is later.

Regulations adopted under (a) of this section must, consistent with sustained yield and the provisions of AS

16.05.258

, provide a fair and reasonable opportunity for the taking of fishery resources by personal use, sport, and commercial fishermen.

The Board of Fisheries may allocate fishery resources among personal use, sport, guided sport, and commercial fisheries. The board shall adopt criteria for the allocation of fishery resources and shall use the criteria as appropriate to particular allocation decisions. The criteria may include factors such as

the history of each personal use, sport, guided sport, and commercial fishery;

the number of residents and nonresidents who have participated in each fishery in the past and the number of residents and nonresidents who can reasonably be expected to participate in the future;

the importance of each fishery for providing residents the opportunity to obtain fish for personal and family consumption;

the availability of alternative fisheries resources;

the importance of each fishery to the economy of the state;

the importance of each fishery to the economy of the region and local area in which the fishery is located;

the importance of each fishery in providing recreational opportunities for residents and nonresidents.

Except as expressly provided in AS

16.40.120(e)

and

16.40.130

, the Board of Fisheries may not adopt regulations or take action regarding the issuance, denial, or conditioning of a permit under AS

16.40.100

or

16.40.120

, the construction or operation of a farm or hatchery required to have a permit under AS

16.40.100

, or a harvest with a permit issued under AS

16.40.120

.

The Board of Fisheries shall consider a request of the commissioner for approval of a petition to the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to establish a moratorium on new entrants into a commercial fishery under AS

16.43.225

at the board’s next regular or special meeting that follows the receipt by the board of the request for approval of the petition and that allows time for the notice required under this subsection. The board may consider the request of the commissioner for approval of the petition only after 15 days’ public notice of the board’s intention to consider approval of the petition. The board shall consider whether the commissioner, in support of the request for approval of the petition, has adequately shown that the fishery meets requirements for a moratorium on new entrants under AS

16.05.050

. The board by a majority vote of its members at the meeting when the petition must be considered shall approve or disapprove the petition.

The Board of Fisheries shall adopt by regulation a policy for the management of mixed stock fisheries. The policy shall provide for the management of mixed stock fisheries in a manner that is consistent with sustained yield of wild fish stocks.

Notwithstanding AS

16.43.140(c)(5)

, the board may adopt, at a regularly scheduled meeting at which the board considers regulatory proposals for management of a specific salmon fishery, a regulation to allow a person who holds two entry permits for that salmon fishery an additional fishing opportunity appropriate for that particular fishery.

History.

(§ 3 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 151 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 110 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 132 SLA 1984; am §§ 1 — 3, 12 ch 52 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2 ch 90 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988, a reference to “AS

16.40.120(d)

” was deleted from (f) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 7, ch. 145, SLA 1988. Paragraph (a)(13) was enacted as (a)(12). Renumbered in 1986.

Cross references. —

For restriction on maximum area of land that may be closed to multiple uses without an act of the state legislature, see AS

38.05.300(a)

; for legislative findings in connection with the enactment of (a)(13) of this section, see § 1, ch. 76, SLA 1986, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legislative findings in connection with the 1988 amendment to (a)(2) of this section, see § 1, ch. 93, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2005 addition of paragraph (a)(17), see § 1, ch. 87, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For Kotzebue Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 2.

For Norton Sound-Port Clarence Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 3.

For Yukon-Northern Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 4.

For Kuskokwim Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 5.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 6.

For Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 7.

For Alaska Peninsula Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 8.

For Chignik Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 9.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 10.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 11.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 12.

For Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 13.

For Southeastern Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 14.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 2, art. 1.

For Southeastern Alaska-Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 2.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 3.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 4.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 5.

For Alaska Peninsula-Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 6.

For Bering Sea Area, see 5 AAC 2, art. 7.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 3, art. 1.

For fishing districts and subdistricts, see 5 AAC 3, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 3, art. 3.

For sheefish fishery, see 5 AAC 3, art. 6.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 4, art. 1.

For fishing districts and subdistricts, see 5 AAC 4, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 4, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 5, art. 1.

For fishing districts and subdistricts, see 5 AAC 5, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 5, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 6, art. 1.

For fishing districts, subdistricts, and sections, see 5 AAC 6, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 6, art. 3.

For smelt fishery, see 5 AAC 6, art. 5.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 7, art. 1.

For fishing districts, subdistricts, and sections, see 5 AAC 7, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 7, art. 3.

For freshwater fishery, see 5 AAC 7, art. 6.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 9, art. 1.

For fishing districts and sections, see 5 AAC 9, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 9, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 11, art. 1.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 11, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 12, art. 1.

For fishing districts and sections, see 5 AAC 12, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 12, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 15, art. 1.

For fishing districts, sections, and subsections, see 5 AAC 15, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 15, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 18, art. 1.

For fishing districts and sections, see 5 AAC 18, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 18, art. 3.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 21, art. 1.

For fishing districts, subdistricts, and sections, see 5 AAC 21, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 3.

For smelt fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 5.

For freshwater fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 8.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 24, art. 1.

For fishing districts, subdistricts, and sections, see 5 AAC 24, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 24, art. 3.

For smelt fishery, see 5 AAC 24, art. 5.

For freshwater fishery, see 5 AAC 24, art. 8.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 27, art. 1.

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 27, art. 3.

For Southeastern Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 27, art. 4.

For Yakutat Area (Registration Area D), see 5 AAC 27, art. 5.

For Prince William Sound Area (Registration Area E), see 5 AAC 27, art. 6.

For Cook Inlet Area (Registration Area H), see 5 AAC 27, art. 7.

For Kodiak Area (Registration Area K), see 5 AAC 27, art. 8.

For Chignik Area (Registration Area L), see 5 AAC 27, art. 9.

For Alaska Peninsula-Aleutian Islands Area (Registration Area M), see 5 AAC 27, art. 10.

For Bristol Bay Area (Registration Area T), see 5 AAC 27, art. 12.

For Kuskokwim Area (Registration Area W), see 5 AAC 27, art. 13.

For Bering Sea-Kotzebue Area (Registration Area Q), see 5 AAC 27, art. 14.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 28, art. 1.

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 28, art. 3.

For Eastern Gulf of Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 28, art. 4.

For Prince William Sound Area (Registration Area E), see 5 AAC 28, art. 5.

For Cook Inlet Area (Registration Area H), see 5 AAC 28, art. 6.

For Kodiak Area (Registration Area K), see 5 AAC 28, art. 7.

For Chignik Area (Registration Area L), see 5 AAC 28, art. 8.

For South Alaska Peninsula Area (Registration Area M), see 5 AAC 28, art. 9.

For Bering Sea — Aleutian Islands Area (Registration Area O), see 5 AAC 28, art. 10.

For Chukchi-Beaufort Area (Registration Area Y), see 5 AAC 28, art. 11.

For definitions, see 5 AAC 28, art. 12.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 29, art. 2.

For management and allocation management plans, see 5 AAC 29, art. 3.

For fishing seasons and periods, see 5 AAC 29, art. 4.

For fishery management plans, see 5 AAC 29, art. 5.

For gear and vessel specifications and registration, see 5 AAC 29, art. 6.

For size and landing requirements, see 5 AAC 29, art. 7.

For closed waters, see 5 AAC 29, art. 8.

For salmon trolling in hatchery special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 29, art. 9.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 30, art. 1.

For fishing districts, see 5 AAC 30, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 30, art. 3.

For bottomfish fishery, see 5 AAC 30, art. 4.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 31, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 31, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 31, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 31, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 31, art. 8.

For Registration Area G (Outer Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 31, art. 9.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 31, art. 10.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 32, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 32, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 32, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 32, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 32, art. 8.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 32, art. 9.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 33, art. 1.

For fishing districts and sections, see 5 AAC 33, art. 2.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 33, art. 3.

For smelt fishery, see 5 AAC 33, art. 5.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 34, art. 1.

For conditions for license and permits, see 5 AAC 34, art. 3.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 34, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 34, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 34, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 34, art. 8.

For Registration Area K (Kodiak), see 5 AAC 34, art. 9.

For Registration Area M (Alaska Peninsula), see 5 AAC 34, art. 10.

For Registration Area O (Aleutian Islands Area), see 5 AAC 34, art. 11.

For Registration Area T (Bristol Bay), see 5 AAC 34, art. 13.

For Registration Area Q (Bering Sea), see 5 AAC 34, art. 14.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 35, art. 1.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 35, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 35, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 35, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 35, art. 8.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 35, art. 10.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 36, art. 1.

For salmon, see 5 AAC 36, art. 3.

For harvest provisions, see 5 AAC 37, art. 1.

For seasons, see 5 AAC 37, art. 2.

For harvest requirements, see 5 AAC 37, art. 3.

For restrictions, see 5 AAC 37, art. 9.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 38, art. 1.

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 38, art. 4.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern Alaska), see 5 AAC 38, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 38, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 38, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 38, art. 8.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 38, art. 9.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 39, art. 2.

For shellfish fishery, see 5 AAC 39, art. 6.

For commercial freshwater fishery, see 5 AAC 39, art. 7.

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

For scope of regulations, see 5 AAC 41, art. 1.

For permit system established, see 5 AAC 41, art. 2.

For aquarium stocking, see 5 AAC 41, art. 5.

For Southeast Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 47.

For Upper Copper River and Upper Susitna River Area, see 5 AAC 52.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 55.

For Kenai Peninsula Area, see 5 AAC 56.

For Kenai River Drainage Area, see 5 AAC 57.

For Cook Inlet — Resurrection Bay Saltwater Area, see 5 AAC 58.

For Anchorage Bowl Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 59.

For Knik Arm Drainages Area, see 5 AAC 60.

For Susitna River Drainage Area, see 5 AAC 61.

For West Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 62.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 64.

For Alaska Peninsula and Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 65.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 67.

For Arctic-Yukon-Kuskokwim Region, see 5 AAC 70.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 75, art. 2.

For closed waters and prohibited acts, see 5 AAC 75, art. 3.

For fishing services and sport fishing guides, see 5 AAC 75, art. 4.

For management of trout, see 5 AAC 75, art. 5.

For definitions, see 5 AAC 75, art. 9.

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 77, art. 1.

For Kotzebue Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 2.

For Norton Sound-Port Clarence Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 3.

For Yukon — Northern Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 4.

For Kuskokwim Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 5.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 6.

For Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 7.

For Alaska Peninsula Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 8.

For Chignik Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 9.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 10.

For Cook Inlet Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 11.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 12.

For Yakutat Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 13.

For Southeastern Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 77, art. 14.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

For subsistence uses, see 5 AAC 99.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For discussion of compatibility of state subsistence-use law with federal standards as set forth in Alaska National Interest Lands Conservation Act (16 U.S.C. § 3115 et seq.), see 1981 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

The Board of Fisheries is empowered to adopt regulations that will provide broodstock to the hatcheries; furthermore, because management for sustained yield is required by article VIII, section 4, of the Alaska Constitution, the law directs the board to manage for this result. Aug. 1, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.253.
Operation of stationary fishing gear.

The Board of Fisheries may require a person who holds a limited entry permit or an interim-use permit under AS 16.43 to be physically present at a beach or riparian fishing site during the operation of net gear or other stationary fishing gear at the site, except when the permit holder is at or traveling to or from the location of

a sale of fish caught in the gear; or

other stationary gear of the permit holder.

In this section, “fishing site ” means fishing site as defined by the Board of Fisheries and includes any structure used for providing shelter in support of the operation of the net gear or other stationary fishing gear.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1983)

Sec. 16.05.255.
Regulations of the Board of Game; management requirements.

The Board of Game may adopt regulations it considers advisable in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for

setting apart game reserve areas, refuges, and sanctuaries in the water or on the land of the state over which it has jurisdiction, subject to the approval of the legislature;

establishing open and closed seasons and areas for the taking of game;

establishing the means and methods employed in the pursuit, capture, taking, and transport of game, including regulations, consistent with resource conservation and development goals, establishing means and methods that may be employed by persons with physical disabilities;

setting quotas, bag limits, harvest levels, and sex, age, and size limitations on the taking of game;

classifying game as game birds, song birds, big game animals, fur bearing animals, predators, or other categories;

methods, means, and harvest levels necessary to control predation and competition among game in the state;

watershed and habitat improvement, and management, conservation, protection, use, disposal, propagation, and stocking of game;

prohibiting the live capture, possession, transport, or release of native or exotic game or their eggs;

establishing the times and dates during which the issuance of game licenses, permits, and registrations and the transfer of permits and registrations between registration areas and game management units or subunits is allowed;

regulating sport hunting and subsistence hunting as needed for the conservation, development, and utilization of game;

taking game to ensure public safety;

regulating the activities of persons licensed to control nuisance wild birds and nuisance wild small mammals;

promoting hunting and trapping and preserving the heritage of hunting and trapping in the state.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 52 SLA 1986.]

If the Board of Game denies a petition or proposal to amend, adopt, or repeal a regulation, the board, upon receiving a written request from the sponsor of the petition or proposal, shall in addition to the requirements of AS

44.62.230

provide a written explanation for the denial to the sponsor not later than 30 days after the board has officially met and denied the sponsor’s petition or proposal, or 30 days after receiving the request for an explanation, whichever is later.

Regulations adopted under (a) of this section must provide that, consistent with the provisions of AS

16.05.258

, the taking of moose, deer, elk, and caribou by residents for personal or family consumption has preference over taking by nonresidents.

The Board of Game shall adopt regulations to provide for intensive management programs to restore the abundance or productivity of identified big game prey populations as necessary to achieve human consumptive use goals of the board in an area where the board has determined that

consumptive use of the big game prey population is a preferred use;

depletion of the big game prey population or reduction of the productivity of the big game prey population has occurred and may result in a significant reduction in the allowable human harvest of the population; and

enhancement of abundance or productivity of the big game prey population is feasibly achievable utilizing recognized and prudent active management techniques.

The Board of Game may not significantly reduce the taking of an identified big game prey population by adopting regulations relating to restrictions on harvest or access to the population, or to management of the population by customary adjustments in seasons, bag limits, open and closed areas, methods and means, or by other customary means authorized under (a) of this section, unless the board has adopted regulations, or has scheduled for adoption at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board regulations, that provide for intensive management to increase the take of the population for human harvest consistent with (e) of this section. This subsection does not apply if the board

determines that intensive management would be

ineffective, based on scientific information;

inappropriate due to land ownership patterns; or

against the best interest of subsistence uses; or

declares that a biological emergency exists and takes immediate action to protect or maintain the big game prey population in conjunction with the scheduling for adoption of those regulations that are necessary to implement (e) of this section.

The Board of Game shall establish population and harvest goals and seasons for intensive management of identified big game prey populations to achieve a high level of human harvest.

[Repealed, 2000 Ballot Measure No. 6.]

For the purpose of encouraging adults to take children hunting, the board shall establish annual hunting seasons in appropriate areas of the state for big game, other than bison and musk ox. Only a resident child accompanied by a resident adult or a child accompanied by the child’s resident parent, resident grandparent, resident stepparent, or resident legal guardian may take big game in an area where a season established under this subsection is in effect. The adult, parent, grandparent, stepparent, or legal guardian who accompanies the child may only assist the child in taking big game. A big game animal taken under this subsection, except for a Sitka blacktail deer when the harvest limit for the deer is one for each person, must be counted against the bag limits of both the child and the adult, parent, grandparent, stepparent, or legal guardian who accompanies the child. In this subsection,

“adult” means an individual who is 21 years of age or older;

“child” means an individual who is not more than 17 years of age and not younger than eight years of age.

This section authorizes the board to regulate regarding the conservation, development, or utilization of game in a manner that addresses whether, how, when, and where the public asset of game is allocated or appropriated.

In this section,

“harvestable surplus” means the number of animals that is estimated to equal the number of offspring born in a game population during a year less the number of animals required for recruitment for population maintenance and enhancement, when necessary, and the number of animals in the population that die from all causes, other than predation or human harvest, during that year;

“high level of human harvest” means the allocation of a sufficient portion of the harvestable surplus of a game population to achieve a high probability of success for human harvest of the game population based on biological capabilities of the population and considering hunter demand;

“identified big game prey population” means a population of ungulates that is identified by the Board of Game and that is important for providing high levels of harvest for human consumptive use;

“intensive management” means management of an identified big game prey population consistent with sustained yield through active management measures to enhance, extend, and develop the population to maintain high levels or provide for higher levels of human harvest, including control of predation and prescribed or planned use of fire and other habitat improvement techniques;

“sustained yield” means the achievement and maintenance in perpetuity of the ability to support a high level of human harvest of game, subject to preferences among beneficial uses, on an annual or periodic basis.

History.

(§ 3 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 151 SLA 1978; am §§ 10, 11 ch 132 SLA 1984; am §§ 4, 5, 12 ch 52 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1996; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 76 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2000; am § 1 2000 Ballot Measure No. 6; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h) and paragraphs (j)(1), (2), and (5) were enacted as (g)(3)-(5), respectively. Relettered in 1998, at which time former (g)(1) and (2) were renumbered as (h)(3) and (4), and relettered as (i) in 2000, as (j) in 2001 and as (k) in 2008.

Former subsection (h) was enacted as (i); relettered in 2000.

Subsection (i) was enacted as (j); relettered in 2001, at which time former subsection (i) was relettered as (j).

Subsection (j) was enacted as (k); relettered in 2008, at which time former subsection (j) was relettered as (k).

Cross references. —

For restriction on maximum area of land that may be closed to multiple uses without an act of the state legislature, see AS

38.05.300(a)

.

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of (e), (f), and (k)(3) and (4) [formerly (e)-(g)] of this section, see § 1, ch. 13, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.
For legislative findings relating to the 1998 amendment to paragraph (i)(4) (formerly (h)(4)) and the enactment of paragraphs (i)(1), (i)(2), and (i)(5) (formerly ((h)(1), (h)(2), and (h)(5)) and subsection (g), see § 1, ch. 76, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative statement giving direction to the Board of Game to adopt regulations to govern the activities of a person who is licensed to control nuisance wild birds and small mammals authorized by paragraph (a)(12) of this section, see § 6,
ch. 132, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2005 addition of paragraph (a)(13), see § 1, ch. 87, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For trapping seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 84, art. 7.

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For hunting seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 5.

For licenses, harvest tickets, harvest reports, tags, and fees, see 5 AAC 92, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For intensive management, see 5 AAC 92, art. 5.

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For emergency taking, see 5 AAC 92, art. 9.

For game management units, see 5 AAC 92, art. 11.

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For definitions, see 5 AAC 92, art. 20.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state critical habitat areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 6.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

For adoption of fish and game regulations, see 5 AAC 96, art. 5.

For subsistence uses, see 5 AAC 99.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Neither the Board of Game nor the Department of Fish and Game has jurisdiction over domestic animals.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Permitting authority over live game, that is, nondomestic animals, rests with the Board of Game as implemented by the Department of Fish and Game.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

For discussion of compatibility of state subsistence-use law with federal standards as set forth in Alaska National Interest Lands Conservation Act (16 U.S.C. § 3115 et seq.), see 1981 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

The Board of Game has general authority to regulate the live capture and possession of game under AS

16.05.255(a)(8)

.
Apr. 2, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under

16.05.255

(a)(5), (a)(8), and (d) and
AS

16.05.258

, the board’s authority to regulate uses of elk in the wild is not diminished under ch. 88, SLA 1987. That act does not alter the broad statutory definitions of “ ‘domestic mammals’ or ‘game’ in
AS

16.05.940

, which define the scope of the board’s authorities under
AS

16.05.255

. Jan. 18, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Board of Game is the proper entity to regulate the possession and propagation of game birds as pets.
Apr. 2, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

For purposes of conservation, development, and utilization, the Board of Game has general authority to regulate seasons, areas, bag limits, and quotas for sport and subsistence hunting.
Apr. 12, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The board’s general authority in this section to regulate subsistence hunting as needed for conservation, development, and utilization of game, together with the statutory definition of subsistence hunting to include both taking and possession, authorizes the board to regulate post-taking uses.
Apr. 12, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Board of Game has authority to adopt regulations that require the harvest of moose taken under subsistence permits to be used only for purposes of the Nuchalawoyya Potlatch so long as the regulation does not limit participation only to residents of certain areas.
Apr. 12, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is well within the authorities of the Board of Game under subsection (a) and the Department of Fish and Game under AS

16.05.020

to determine by regulation the point at which certain animals are deemed feral and subject to whatever game regulations the board may wish to adopt.
A board or departmental regulation defining “feral animal” would be applicable statewide regardless of land ownership.
July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.256.
Nonresident and nonresident alien permits.

Whenever it is necessary to restrict the taking of big game so that the opportunity for state residents to take big game can be reasonably satisfied in accordance with sustained yield principles, the Board of Game may, through a permit system, limit the taking of big game by nonresidents and nonresident aliens to accomplish that purpose.

History.

(§ 3 ch 74 SLA 1982)

Sec. 16.05.257.
Subsistence hunting regulations. [Repealed, § 12 ch 52 SLA 1986.]